Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 15.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-1015
Mixed-use project, defined.

Mixed-use project
means a facility containing a minimum of fifty thousand square feet. The project
must include at least two vertical stories of usable or leasable space and
contain a minimum of two uses, such as restaurant, office, retail, or residential,
not including parking. Retail stores shall occupy no more than forty percent
of the total gross usable area.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 15.